csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Cnj_V.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niimisiiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: niimisiiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: niimisiiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: niimisiiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: niimisiigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niimisiiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: niimisiiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: niimisiiwiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nagamosiiwaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: nagamosiiwegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: nagamosiiwanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiiwaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nagamosiiwaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: nagamosiiwangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nagamosiiwiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niimiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: niimiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: niimiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: niimiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: niimigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niimiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: niimiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: niimiwiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nagamowaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: nagamowegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: nagamowanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nagamowaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nagamogwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nagamowaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: nagamowangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nagamowiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: niimisiiwaambaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: niimisiiwegibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: niimisiiwambanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: niimisiiwaagobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: niimisiigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: niimisiiwaangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: niimisiiwangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: niimisiiwiingibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nagamosiiwaambaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nagamosiiwegibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nagamosiiwambanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nagamosiinigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiiwaagobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiinigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nagamosiiwaangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nagamosiiwangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: nagamosiiwiingibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: niimiwaambaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: niimiwegibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: niimiwambanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: niiminigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: niimiwaagobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: niiminigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: niimigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: niimiwaangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: niimiwangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: niimiwiingibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nagamowaambaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nagamowegibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nagamowambanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nagamonigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nagamowaagobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nagamonigobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nagamogobanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nagamowaangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nagamowangibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: nagamowiingibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: niimisiwaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: niimisiweg
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: niimisiwan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: niimisinig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: niimisigwaa
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: niimisinig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: niimisig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niimisiwaang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: niimisiwang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: niimising
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: nagamosiwaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: nagamosiweg
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: nagamosiwan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nagamosinig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nagamosigwaa
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nagamosinig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nagamosig
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nagamosiwaang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: nagamosiwang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nagamosing
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niimiyaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: niimiyeg
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: niimiyan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: niiminid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: niimiwaad
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: niiminid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: niimid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niimiyaang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: niimiyang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: niiming
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nagamoyaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: nagamoyeg
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: nagamoyan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nagamonid
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nagamowaad
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nagamonid
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nagamod
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nagamoyaang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: nagamoyang
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nagamong
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niimisiwaambaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: niimisiwegiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: niimisiwamban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: niimisinigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: niimisigwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: niimisinigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: niimisigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niimisiwaangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: niimisiwangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: niimisingiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nagamosiwaambaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: nagamosiwegiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: nagamosiwamban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nagamosinigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nagamosigwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nagamosinigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nagamosigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nagamosiwaangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: nagamosiwangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nagamosingiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niimiyaambaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: niimiyegiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: niimiyamban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: niiminipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: niimiwaapan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: niiminipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: niimipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niimiyaangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: niimiyangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: niimingiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nagamoyaambaan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: nagamoyegiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: nagamoyamban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nagamonipan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nagamowaapan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nagamonipan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nagamopan
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nagamoyaangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: nagamoyangiban
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nagamongiban
